Utah statutes.
36-23-102.   Occupational and Professional Licensure Review Committee.

(1)  There is created the Occupational and Professional Licensure Review Committee.

(2)  The committee consists of nine members appointed as follows:

(a)  three members of the House of Representatives, appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives, no more than two from the same political party;

(b)  three members of the Senate, appointed by the president of the Senate, no more than two from the same political party; and

(c) three public members appointed jointly by the speaker of the House of Representatives and the president of the Senate as follows:

(i) two members who have previously served, but are no longer serving, on any of the advisory boards created under Title 58, Occupations and Professions; and

(ii) one member from the general public who does not hold any type of license issued by the Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing.

(3) (a)  The speaker of the House of Representatives shall designate a member of the House of Representatives appointed under Subsection (2)(a) as a cochair of the committee.

(b)  The president of the Senate shall designate a member of the Senate appointed under Subsection (2)(b) as a cochair of the committee.



Amended by Chapter 218, 2008 General Session

